California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) The corps shall cooperate with, and seek the cooperation of, state and local workforce investment boards and youth councils, designated pursuant to any federal workforce development or investment act to secure employment and training services for corpsmembers.

(b) These employment and training services may include job search assistance, skills training, transitional employment, or any other services provided under a federal workforce development or investment act that would lead to employment for the corpsmember.

(c) Employment and training services may be provided to corpsmembers as a component of their work with the corps or upon their separation from the
 corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 131, Sec. 6.   (AB 2966)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14404.

The corps shall assist corpsmembers who desire to return to school to develop plans to accomplish this goal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1710, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14405.

Implementation of the educational component of the nonresidential program established pursuant to this chapter shall be contingent on the California Conservation Corps receiving sufficient funding from any source, including any federal workforce development or investment act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 131, Sec. 7.   (AB 2966)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14406.

The corps may contract with public or private nonprofit agencies to provide services for a nonresidential program. The public or private nonprofit agency shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) The agency shall submit a proposal which demonstrates that its program is consistent with the policies of the corps and with this chapter.

(b) The agency shall, to the extent possible, secure funding or services from the local service delivery area for necessary employment and training services.

(c) The agency shall secure reimbursements for a significant portion of the work performed.

(d) The agency shall secure a commitment from local educational institutions that appropriate educational services will be provided.

(e) The agency shall maintain, to the extent possible, the funding from foundations and other public and private organizations for a nonresidential program. If the agency does not have an existing nonresidential program, it shall secure at least a 25-percent match from other public or private organizations for the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1606, Sec. 2.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Forestry Corps Program [14410. - 14413.]

14410.

No later than July 1, 2019, the director shall establish a forestry corps program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 635, Sec. 2.   (AB 2126)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14411.

(a) The forestry corps program shall accomplish all of the following objectives:

(1) Develop and implement forest health projects, pursuant to Section 14412.

(2) Establish forestry corps crews, pursuant to Section 14413.

(3) Provide assistance to corps members in obtaining forestry and forest technician degrees and certificates.

(4) Train corps members to operate equipment in forestry and related fields.

(5) Create pathways from the corps to degree programs and jobs.

(b) The director may partner with community colleges, trade associations, forest and timber industries, vocational educational institutions, and apprenticeship programs to provide training and experience to corps members.

(c) The director shall partner with the certified community conservation corps, pursuant to Section 14507.5, where feasible, in implementing the forestry corps program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 635, Sec. 2.   (AB 2126)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14412.

Forest health projects may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Fuels reduction and hazardous fuels removal. 

(b) Seedling and tree planting. 

(c) Cone and seed collection.

(d) Tree mortality and tree felling.

(e) Tree nursery and arborist training.

(f) Forestry and conservation awareness and educational outreach.

(g) Participation in forestry pilot
 programs.

(h) Wildlands forest firefighting training.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 635, Sec. 2.   (AB 2126)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14413.

(a) No later than January 1, 2020, the director shall establish two forestry corps crews, one to be based in the Central Valley and the other in the Inland Empire, as follows:

(1) To the extent feasible, the Central Valley forestry corps crew shall be administered and operated as a Greater Valley Conservation Corps program and shall be available to members of the Greater Valley Conservation Corps.

(2) The Inland Empire forestry corps crew shall be administered by the department and shall be based at the Inland Empire Center. 

(b) No later than January 1, 2020, the director shall establish two additional forestry
 corps crews, each to be based in either a state responsibility area, as defined in Section 4102, or a very high hazard fire zone, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 51177 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 635, Sec. 2.   (AB 2126)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. The Education and Employment Reentry Program [14415. - 14415.6.]

14415.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Conserving or developing natural resources and enhancing and maintaining environmentally important lands and waters is essential for protecting the state’s environment, bolstering its economy, and providing safe and resilient communities for Californians to live in.

(2) The California Conservation Camp program operated jointly by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection provides work crews of incarcerated individuals to assist in all types of emergencies in support of the work of our frontline personnel during wildfires, floods, search and rescue, and
 earthquakes. When not assisting in emergencies, the crews participate in conservation and community service work projects for state, federal, and local government agencies.

(3) The corps is the oldest and largest state conservation corps in the nation that puts youth and the environment together to benefit both, tasking young people to protect and restore California’s environment, respond to disasters, and become stronger workers, citizens, and individuals through their service.

(4) The corps offers a unique opportunity to form strategic partnerships to provide valuable job opportunities in resource conservation, resource management, fuels and vegetation management, and emergency incident mitigation for formerly incarcerated individuals who successfully served on a California Conservation Camp program crew.

(5) Building on their valuable experience in the California Conservation Camp program, a segment of former California Conservation Camp program participants may be available to support the federal, state, and local governments, local publicly owned electric utilities and electrical corporations, fire safe councils, and private landowners in helping California meet its aggressive goals to do all of the following:

(A) Proactively restore forest health to reduce greenhouse gases.

(B) Protect source watersheds from which the state’s water supply originates.

(C) Promote the long-term storage of carbon in forest trees and soils.

(D) Minimize the loss of forest carbon from large, intense wildfires.

(E) Further the goals of the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(6) Research demonstrates that formerly incarcerated individuals who have low performance, involvement, and satisfaction with school or work are more likely to recidivate than individuals who do not exhibit these characteristics. Research also shows that rehabilitation programs, including substance use disorder treatment and employment preparation, can be designed to address specific criminal risk factors.

(7) While participating in the corps, corpsmembers are offered life skills training, training in environmental awareness and civic responsibility, as well as reentry and counseling services, and gain access to high school courses through the corps’ existing contracts
 and cooperation with high schools and community colleges.

(8) Drawing upon the expertise of the corps, collaborations and partnerships with workforce development programs and local and state agencies can be established to provide valuable job opportunities for formerly incarcerated individuals, consistent with the expertise of the corps to increase awareness of and improve our natural resources, instill basic skills and a healthy work ethic, build character, self-esteem, and self-discipline, establish a workforce with a strong sense of civic responsibility, and blend academic and growth opportunities in order to develop productive citizens who can make substantial contributions as California workers and citizens.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to serve the interests of all Californians by providing hope and opportunity for formerly incarcerated
 individuals by offering additional pathways to employment with a living wage in jobs that move the state forward on critical resource management objectives while providing those individuals the opportunity to make a difference for themselves and for the people of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14415.1.

(a) The director may establish the Education and Employment Reentry Program within the corps and may enroll in the program formerly incarcerated individuals who successfully served on a California Conservation Camp program crew and were recommended for participation as a program member by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection and the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “program” means the Education and Employment Reentry Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14415.2.

(a) Persons described in Section 14415.1 shall be selected for participation as a program member on the basis of motivation, hard work, personal development, and public service, and without regard to their prior employment or educational background. Program member enrollment shall follow the same policies as corpsmember enrollment within the corps. Program enrollment shall be for a period of up to one year with the opportunity to extend program participation in accordance with corps policy. The director, in conjunction with the Employment Development Department, shall prioritize developing and executing plans to assist program members in obtaining continued employment following participation in the program. During participation in the program, program participants shall receive a stipend consistent with
 the current corpsmember pay system. Program participants shall also be eligible for benefits offered to all corpsmembers.

(b) Subject to the discretion and approval of the director, the corps may enter into a planning agreement with appropriate state and local agencies, including, but not limited to, local community conservation corps and organizations providing reentry and counseling services, to develop reentry and job training opportunities for individuals described in subdivision (a) of Section 14415.1 who do not otherwise qualify for corps enrollment under corps policies, such as age limitations. This subdivision does not require acceptance into the corps as a corpsmember of any individual over 25 years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14415.3.

Participants in the program shall generally be engaged in any of the following activities:

(a) Natural resources or land management projects.

(b) Fuels reduction and vegetation management projects.

(c) Proactively restoring forest health to reduce greenhouse gases.

(d) Conserving, maintaining, improving, and developing natural resources in both urban and rural areas.

(e) Assisting in fire prevention and assisting in disaster operations.

(f) Protecting source watersheds from which the state’s water supply originates.

(g) Promoting the long-term storage of carbon in forest trees and soils.

(h) Minimizing the loss of forest carbon from large, intense wildfires.

(i) Assisting departments within the Natural Resources Agency in developing, rehabilitating, and restoring parklands, recreational facilities, and historical resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14415.4.

The program shall accomplish all of the following objectives:

(a) Develop, partner with, and create opportunities for the forestry corps program objectives described in Section 14411.

(b) Collaborate with the Employment Development Department to provide access to workforce services.

(c) Collaborate with nongovernmental organizations dedicated to providing access to counseling, mentorship, supportive housing, health care, and educational opportunities.

(d) Employ collaborations and partnerships available to the corps consistent with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14415.5.

The program established pursuant to this chapter shall not replace or restrict existing or future programs and training offered to formerly incarcerated individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14415.6.

Implementation of the program pursuant to this chapter is contingent upon an appropriation being made in the annual Budget Act or another statute for its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 587, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Corpsmember Educational and Employment Outcome Reporting [14420. - 14424.]

14420.

For purposes of this chapter, “cohort” means all corpsmembers who permanently separate from the corps in a state fiscal year after having been enrolled for more than 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 32.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14422.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to evaluate how effectively the corps transitions corpsmembers into educational and employment opportunities upon completion of their service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 32.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14424.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2020, the corps shall report by December 31 of each year the total number of corpsmembers in the cohort who permanently separated from the corps during the state fiscal year that ended 18 months before the date the report is due.

(b) To the extent feasible, the report shall include the number of corpsmembers in the cohort who did any of the following in the 12-month period following final separation from the corps:

(1) Enrolled in an adult school or other precollegiate-level program.

(2) Enrolled in an apprenticeship or other vocational education program.

(3) Enrolled in postsecondary education.

(4) Were employed during the second and fourth quarters.

(5) Were simultaneously employed and enrolled in a secondary, postsecondary, or apprenticeship or other vocational education program.

(6) Obtained employment in jobs that they received specialized training to perform while they were enrolled in the corps.

(c) To assess longer-term outcomes for corpsmembers, the report shall also include the number of corpsmembers in the cohort who received any of the following either while serving in the corps or in the 12-month period following final separation from the corps:

(1) A high school
 diploma or its recognized equivalent.

(2) An industry-recognized credential.

(3) An associate or bachelor’s degree.

(d) To assess the performance of variations in the delivery of the corps’ programs, the corps shall disaggregate the data reported pursuant to this section into the following subgroups of corpsmembers:

(1) Partial-year corpsmembers, who enrolled in the corps for a period of more than 60 days but less than one year.

(2) Full-year corpsmembers, who enrolled in the corps for a period of one year or more.

(3) Residential center corpsmembers, who resided in a residential center for the majority of the time they were
 enrolled in the corps.

(4) Nonresidential center corpsmembers, who reported to a nonresidential center for the majority of the time they were enrolled in the corps.

(e) The corps shall provide the report to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees in both houses of the Legislature, as well as the relevant budget subcommittees and policy committees in both houses of the Legislature that have subject matter jurisdiction over the corps.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 32.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12.1. CALIFORNIA BEVERAGE CONTAINER RECYCLING AND LITTER REDUCTION ACT [14500. - 14599.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings [14500. - 14501.5.]

14500.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Beverage Container Recycling and Litter Reduction Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14501.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Experience in this state and others demonstrates that financial incentives and convenient return systems ensure the efficient and large-scale recycling of beverage containers. Accordingly, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage increased, and more convenient, beverage container redemption opportunities for all consumers. These redemption opportunities shall consist of dealer and other shopping center locations, independent and industry operated recycling centers, curbside programs, and other recycling systems that assure all consumers, in every region of the state, the opportunity to return beverage containers conveniently, efficiently, and economically.

(b) California grocery, beer, soft drink, container manufacturing, labor, agricultural, consumer, environmental, government, citizen, recreational, taxpayer, and recycling groups have joined together in calling for an innovative program to generate large-scale redemption and recycling of beverage containers.

(c) This division establishes a beverage container recycling goal of 80 percent.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that every container type proves its own recyclability.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to make redemption and recycling convenient to consumers, and the Legislature hereby urges cities and counties, when exercising their zoning authority, to act favorably on the siting of multimaterial recycling centers, reverse vending machines, mobile recycling units, or other types of recycling opportunities, as necessary for consumer convenience, and the overall success of litter abatement and beverage container recycling in the state.

(f) The purpose of this division is to create and maintain a marketplace where it is profitable to establish sufficient recycling centers and locations to provide consumers with convenient recycling opportunities through the establishment of minimum refund values and processing fees and, through the proper application of these elements, to enhance the profitability of recycling centers, recycling locations, and other beverage container recycling programs.

(g) The responsibility to provide convenient, efficient, and economical redemption opportunities rests jointly with manufacturers, distributors, dealers, recyclers, processors, and the Department of Conservation.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this division, that all empty beverage containers redeemed shall be recycled, and that the responsibilities and regulations of the department shall be determined and implemented in a manner that favors the recycling of redeemed containers, as opposed to their disposal.

(i) Nothing in this division shall be interpreted as affecting the current business practices of scrap dealers or recycling centers, except that, to the extent they function as a recycling center or processor, they shall do so in accordance with this division.

(j) The program established by this division will contribute significantly to the reduction of the beverage container component of litter in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14501.5.

This division does not apply to any beverage container which is sold and delivered to a railroad, sleeping car, or steamship company, or common carrier operating vessels, as defined in Section 238 of the Public Utilities Code, operating under a certificate of public convenience and necessity, or an air common carrier, for use and consumption on trains, vessels, or airplanes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [14502. - 14529.7.]

14502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.

“Aluminum beverage container” means a beverage container which consists primarily of aluminum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.5.

“Average monthly volume” means the average number of empty beverage containers per month received by a certified recycling center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1342, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.5.1.

“Bag drop recycling center” means a recycling mechanism operated by a certified recycling center at which consumers can drop off bagged empty beverage containers for redemption. A bag drop recycling center may use a bag drop machine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 18.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14503.6.

“Beneficiating processor” means any person certified by the department as a processor who also beneficiates purchased cullet so that it is furnace ready for glass container manufacturers, consistent with prevailing standards in the manufacturing industry. Cullet shall be deemed furnace ready when it has been cleansed, is free of nonglass contaminants, and has been crushed or otherwise processed in such a manner as to be acceptable without further processing by the purchasing glass container manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1266, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14504.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), “beverage” means any of the following products if those products are in liquid, ready-to-drink form, and are intended for human consumption:

(1) Beer and other malt beverages.

(2) Wine and distilled spirit coolers.

(3) Carbonated water, including soda and carbonated mineral water.

(4) Noncarbonated water, including noncarbonated mineral water.

(5) Carbonated soft drinks.

(6) Noncarbonated soft drinks and
 “sport” drinks.

(7) Carbonated and noncarbonated fruit drinks that contain any percentage of fruit juice.

(8) Coffee and tea drinks.

(9) Vegetable juice.

(10) Distilled spirits.

(11) Wine, or wine from which alcohol has been removed, in whole or in part, whether or not sparkling or carbonated.

(12) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), wine or distilled spirits contained in a beverage container that is a box, bladder, or pouch, or similar container, regardless of the material type from which the beverage container is made.

(b) “Beverage” does not
 include either of the following:

(1) Any product sold in a container that is not an aluminum beverage container, a glass container, a plastic beverage container, or a bimetal container.

(2) Milk, medical food, or infant formula.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Infant formula” means any liquid food described or sold as an alternative for human milk for the feeding of infants.

(2) (A) “Medical food” means a food or beverage that is formulated to be consumed, or administered enterally under the supervision of a physician, and that is intended for specific dietary management of diseases or health conditions for which
 distinctive nutritional requirements, based on recognized scientific principles, are established by medical evaluation.

(B) A “medical food” is a specially formulated and processed product, for the partial or exclusive feeding of a patient by means of oral intake or enteral feeding by tube, and is not a naturally occurring foodstuff used in its natural state.

(C) “Medical food” includes any product that meets the definition of “medical food” in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 360ee(b)(3)).

(3) “Noncarbonated soft drink” means a nonalcoholic, noncarbonated naturally or artificially flavored water containing sugar or sweetener or trace amounts of various elements from both natural and synthetic sources.

(d) This section shall
 become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14505.

“Beverage container” means the individual, separate bottle, can, jar, carton, or other receptacle, however denominated, in which a beverage is sold, and which is constructed of metal, glass, or plastic, or other material, or any combination of these materials. “Beverage container” does not include cups or other similar open or loosely sealed receptacles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14506.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), “beverage manufacturer” means any person who bottles, cans, or otherwise fills beverage containers, or imports filled beverage containers, for sale to distributors, dealers, or consumers.

(b) For a beverage container containing beer, wine, or distilled spirits, the “beverage manufacturer” is the person who holds the license from the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control authorizing the manufacture of the beer, wine, or distilled spirits, regardless of whether that person contracts with a third party to bottle, can, or otherwise fill the beverage container, so long as the beverage container is provided for sale to a distributor, dealer, or consumer by the holder of the
 license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 2.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14506.3.

“Bimetal container” means a beverage container which consists of one or more metals and which is composed primarily of steel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1266, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14506.5.

“Commingled” means a mix of empty beverage containers, as defined in Section 14512, and all other containers of the same material type.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1342, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14506.7.

“Commingled rate” means the ratio of empty beverage containers, as defined in Section 14512, to all other containers of the same material type, as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1342, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14507.5.

(a) “Community Conservation Corps” means a nonprofit public benefit corporation formed or operating pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or an agency operated by a city, county, or city and county, that is certified by the California Conservation Corps as meeting all of the following criteria:

(1) The corps is organized in the form of supervised work crews and selects young adults for participation on the basis of motivation for hard work, personal development, and public service, without regard to their prior employment or educational background, and consistent with Section 14402. Participation shall be for a period
 of one year, and may be extended.

(2) The corps’ program is based upon a highly disciplined work experience, includes an educational component, and is designed to develop corpsmembers’ character and civic consciousness through rigorous work on public projects. The educational component of the corps’ program includes enrollment in a vocational education program, public or charter high school, or postsecondary community college.

(3) The corps compensates corpsmembers at not less than the federal minimum wage, and provides corpsmembers assistance in obtaining permanent employment following their participation in the corps program.

(4) The corps engages in recycling and litter abatement projects as well as
 projects that accomplish the conservationist and other purposes described in subdivisions (a) to (h), inclusive, of Section 14300, and that assist agencies of local government and other nonprofit community organizations in developing, rehabilitating, and restoring parklands, recreational facilities, and other community resources.

(5) The corps consists of an average annual enrollment of not less than 50 corpsmembers between 18 and 26 years of age. In determining the average annual enrollment of a community conservation corps for the purposes of Section 14581.1, the California Conservation Corps shall not include special corpsmembers, as described in Section 14303, who are employed by a community conservation corps.

(b) The California Conservation Corps shall evaluate a community
 conservation corps for the purpose of determining its eligibility for certification, pursuant to this section, after it has completed 12 months of continuous operation, and annually thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 102.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14508.

“Consumer” means every person who, for his or her use or consumption, purchases a beverage in a beverage container from a dealer. “Consumer” includes, but is not limited to, a lodging, eating, or drinking establishment, and soft drink vending machines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14509.

“Container manufacturer” means any person who produces beverage containers for filling by beverage manufacturers, including any person who imports these beverage containers from outside of this state for filling by beverage manufacturers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14509.3.

“Cullet” means scrap glass that is derived from postfilled food, drink, or beverage container glass produced or imported for sale in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 290.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14509.4.

(a) “Convenience zone” means either of the following:

(1) The area within a
 one mile radius of a supermarket.

(2) The area designated by the department pursuant to Section 14571.5.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 14585, an entity that received handling fees pursuant to Section 14585 as of December 31, 2022, shall not be made ineligible for handling fees as a result of the changes made to this section by Senate Bill 1013 of the 2021–22 Regular Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 4.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14509.5.

“Curbside program” means a recycling program which meets all of the following criteria:

(a) The program picks up empty beverage containers from individual or multiple family residences, or both, and the empty beverage containers are separated from waste materials prior to being picked up.

(b) The program is operated by, or pursuant to a contract with, a city, county, or other public agency, or is acknowledged, in writing, by a city, county, or other public agency.

(c) The program accepts empty beverage containers from consumers with the intent to recycle them, but does not pay the refund value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1266, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14510.

(a) “Dealer” means a retail establishment that offers the sale of beverages in beverage containers to consumers.

(b) “Dealer” does not include any lodging, eating, or drinking establishment, wine, beer, or distilled spirits tasting room licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code), or soft drink vending machine operator who engages in the sale of beverages in beverage containers to consumers for consumption onsite. This subdivision does not exempt a distributor from the redemption payment under Section 14560 for sales of beverages in beverage containers to consumers by an entity specified in this subdivision.

(c) To determine which retail establishments are dealers, the department shall use annual or more frequent updates provided by American Business Information, Inc., as long as the information provided by American Business Information, Inc., is updated at least annually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 868, Sec. 3.   (SB 353)   Effective October 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14510.2.

“Dealer cooperative” means a stewardship organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and formed for the purpose of providing redemption opportunities pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14578 and consists of dealers that have an approved dealer cooperative redemption plan. A dealer cooperative is voluntary for a dealer to join pursuant to Section 14578.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 610, Sec. 6.   (SB 1013)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14510.5.

“Department” means the Division of Recycling in the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 21, Sec. 3.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14510.6.

“Director” means the Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 21, Sec. 4.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14511.

“Distributor” means every person who engages in the sale of beverages in beverage containers to a dealer in this state, including any manufacturer who engages in these sales. “Distributor” includes any person who imports beverages from outside of this state for sale to dealers or consumers in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14511.5.

“Drink” means fruit juice or any other noncarbonated drink.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14511.7.

“Dropoff or collection program” means any person, association, nonprofit corporation, church, club, or other organization certified by the department, and that accepts or collects empty beverage containers from consumers with the intention to recycle them, or any waste reduction facility that separates beverage containers from the waste stream with the intent to recycle them. “Dropoff or collection program” does not include a certified recycling center or curbside program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14512.

“Empty beverage container” means a beverage container which meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Has the seal or closure installed by the manufacturer broken or removed. 

(b) Does not contain foreign materials other than the residue of the beverage originally packaged in the beverage container by the manufacturer.

(c) Bears the message required by Section 14561, or is a refillable beverage container.

(d) Has a refund value established pursuant to Section 14560.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 3.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14512.5.

“Food or drink packaging material” means any material which is not a beverage container in which a food or drink is sold in a retail establishment and the food or drink is not intended for consumption on the seller’s premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14512.6.

“For recycling” means that an empty beverage container has been received by a processor who has an arrangement whereby that container will actually be recycled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14512.7.

“Fund” means the California Beverage Container Recycling Fund established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14580.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1339, Sec. 4.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

14513.

“Glass beverage container” means a beverage container which has a body consisting primarily of glass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1290, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14513.2.

(a) Except as provided under Section 14549, “glass container manufacturer” means a person who manufactures commercial containers, whose principal component part or parts consist of virgin glass, postfilled glass, or any combination of both, for sale in California or for export to other states or countries.

(b) “Glass container manufacturer” includes, but is not limited to, all commercial manufacturing operations which produce beverage containers, food or drink packaging material made primarily of glass, or any combination of both of those items. For beer and other malt beverages manufactured outside the state, the container manufacturer shall be deemed to be the person or entity named on the certificate of compliance issued pursuant to Section 23671 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 624, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14513.3.
